




Marvin & Palmer








































A Unique Process
Marvin & Palmer Associates’ four-step investment process addresses both fundamental and behavioral factors to attempt to meet the unique needs of today’s global equity investors.
Read more



A Team Approach
Working together, our seasoned investment team combines broad knowledge, deep experience, and a global focus to continually strive to provide personalized service and superior returns for our clients.
Read more



Contact Us
We have representatives serving clients and consultants worldwide.
Please contact us for more information:
Phone: (302) 573-3570
Email us














Services | Marvin & Palmer









































Services
U.S. Equities
Alternatives




Services
Marvin & Palmer Associates combines macro market environment analysis with focused fundamental research to construct portfolios of quality, large-cap growth stocks in each of its equity strategies.
U.S. Equities
The U.S. strategy emphasizes investments in large capitalization stocks in the United States.
Learn More
Alternatives
MPA Capital Management LLC, an affiliate of M&P, offers institutional investors an Asian Long Short strategy that employs a balanced, low directional, long/short equity strategy.
Learn More















About M&P | Marvin & Palmer









































About M&P
Our History
Our Strengths




About M&P
Built for Lasting Success
Founded in 1986, Marvin & Palmer Associates (M&P) is independent and employee-owned, aligning our interests with our most important asset, our clients. Our firm is built for the long term, and our process and culture have led to a history of outperforming benchmarks.
Our History
M&P’s disciplined investment philosophy and process have been refined over decades, allowing our experienced team to strive to consistently deliver superior returns for our clients.
Learn More
Our Strengths
M&P’s global approach, world-class Advisory Board, and disciplined process are the keys to sustaining our history of outperformance.
Learn More















Contact Us | Marvin & Palmer













































Contact Us
We have representatives serving clients and consultants worldwide. For more information, please contact us.

Marketing Contact
Adam Taylor
(302) 573-3570
Mailing Address
200 Bellevue Parkway
Suite 220
Wilmington, Delaware 19809-3727
USA
Phone & Fax
Phone: (302) 573-3570
Fax: (302) 573-2545
Location
To see where we are located, view map.
Privacy & Security
Please read our Web Site Privacy & Security Statement.




General Inquiries
* Denotes a required field

Are you a current Marvin & Palmer client?*YesNoName:*Email:*

Phone Number:*Message:*Captcha

 


























Our Process | Marvin & Palmer










































Our Process
Our Philosophy




Our Process
Our process flows directly from our philosophy and focuses on combining macro market environment analysis with focused fundamental research on individual companies to construct portfolios of quality, large-cap growth stocks. The stocks held in our portfolios represent the stocks of innovative companies with superior franchises, balance sheets, and managements.
The table below offers a closer look at the steps of our disciplined, repeatable investment process. Click a step for further details.





Step 1: Idea Generation

Ongoing Research Dialogue:  Country/Sector Analysis
Our investment process begins with a daily assessment of markets, research items, geopolitical events, and economic conditions.  Our investment professionals bolster their understanding of the prevailing investment backdrop with discussions and visits with corporations and their directors, often with Chief Executive Officers and Chief Financial Officers.  In addition, our investment personnel utilize a global network of macro, policy, and industry experts to explore issues in greater depth.
Relative Price Strength 
In conjunction with our ongoing appraisal of the investment landscape, we employ two screens to assist with portfolio construction.  Through one screen, we look at the performance of countries, regions, sectors, and stocks versus their respective Index.  This proprietary Relative Price Strength Screen identifies how each of these groups is performing within the context of the Index in which they reside.  Based on 12-month price momentum, these screens allow us to attempt to identify which areas are outperforming the Index, which are underperforming the Index, and which are in some form of transition.  This screen is a key indicator of investor behavior.
Quantitative Fundamental Company Scoring – Quintiles
An additional screen quantitatively ranks the fundamental factors of individual companies.  Each company is given a score of 1 to 5 (5 being the highest score, 1 being the lowest) based on their Quality, Growth, and Value characteristics.  Also, an overall score is assigned to each stock.  The results of the overall scoring process place each stock into the appropriate quintile.  Our targets for emphasis in client portfolios reside in the 3rd, 4th, and 5th quintiles.
Back to top


Step 2: Fundamental Research

Company Assessment
As our fundamental research moves to individual companies, our efforts center on the quality of the company’s franchise, management, financials, and growth prospects.  We also focus on the valuation of the company’s stock to determine whether the pricing of the stock is congruent with the company’s earnings growth rate.   We invest in companies where we have the most confidence that their rate of growth is superior to industry peers, above consensus, and sustainable.
Macro Economic & Geopolitical Backdrop
Our analysis also includes the global macro economic and geopolitical backdrop which provides the context for our investment decisions. While utilizing the news, markets and research to which all companies have access, we bring two specialized resources to our appraisal of current events – our Portfolio Management team and our Advisory Board.
Investment Theme Development
Our consideration of the macro economic and geopolitical backdrop also allows us to begin developing investment themes to include in our portfolios or confirm themes that currently exist in our portfolios.  These themes may include such things as the effects of technology and innovation, demographics and consumer behavior, or government policy.  In identifying these themes, our goal is to focus on clusters of stocks that will benefit from their inclusion in these structural shifts.

Back to top


Step 3: Portfolio Construction

Portfolios Focused on Quality Growth
We create portfolios with three specific types of growth in mind: emerging, strategic, and secular.  Emerging growth companies are on the lower-end of the large market capitalization spectrum and have been identified as rising stars in their industry or sector.  Strategic growth stocks are companies that are expected to show near-term outperformance or are benefiting from current fundamental market trends.  Secular growth stocks are the foundation of our portfolios and consist of companies that are seen as global champions.  These secular growth stocks represent high-conviction, low-turnover positions that are held to withstand market noise.
Portfolio Allocations
Allocations in portfolios are based on our overall assessment of the current market environment combined with our conviction in country, sector, and stock trends. Allocations are monitored on an ongoing basis to ensure that our investment strategy is being implemented effectively and portfolio risk parameters are maintained.
Sell Disciplines
We sell a position in our portfolio for two general reasons, deterioration in fundamentals and deterioration in technical factors. The former could include disruption of an investment theme, erosion of growth and/or valuation, or a better alternative to a current holding. The latter could include emergence of new market leadership, failure of a position’s relative price strength, or a significant interday downward price movement versus the broad market.
Back to top


Step 4: Risk Management

Portfolio Allocation Risk Control
The prevailing market environment is one of the important drivers of each portfolio’s risk profile. Portfolio allocations are monitored on a daily basis to ensure that they reflect the outputs of our investment process and strategy decisions.  Allocations are also monitored to ensure that each portfolio is oriented to a large cap, quality, growth style.
Risk Control Tools
We use our proprietary environmental indicator to closely monitor market behavior. In a market of clear investment leadership and trends, our positioning will be narrowly focused, while more diversified positioning will be applied in times of uncertainty and heightened negative prospects. We also analyze the performance of Style Factors within the markets and monitor the portfolio’s risk profile on a monthly basis.
Structured Reviews of Portfolios and Risk Exposures
Our investment management team also participates in a rigorous schedule of investment meetings to ensure that the team discusses strategy and risks on a regular basis.
Back to top

















Legal Notices | Marvin & Palmer









































Legal Notices
Terms & Conditions of Use / General Privacy & Security Statement
Welcome to MarvinandPalmer.com. This Web Site is owned and operated by Marvin & Palmer Associates, Inc. (“M&P”). You may use MarvinandPalmer.com only if you agree, without modification, to these terms and conditions (“Terms”). These Terms apply regardless of the channel by which you accessed them. Please read the Terms carefully before continuing. By using this Web Site you signify acceptance of our Terms, and you may not use this Web Site unless you agree with the Terms. You agree to use this Web Site in a manner consistent with applicable laws and regulations and in accordance with these Terms as they may be amended from time to time. M&P reserves the right to modify these Terms without notice. These Terms have been revised as of: June 28, 2013.
The terms “M&P Web Site” and this “Web Site” mean the web site having a Uniform Resource Locator (or URL) of MarvinandPalmer.com and any other web site owned, operated, licensed, or controlled by M&P. The term “Representative” means any director, officer, employee or agent of M&P or any affiliate thereof.
M&P will not treat users of this Web Site as partners, clients, customers or investors by virtue of accessing this Web Site.
INDEX

No Investment Advice or Recommendations
Jurisdictional Issues and Applicable Law
Modification of Terms and Web Site
Monitoring of Web Site
Trademarks, Copyrights and Restrictions on Use of Materials
Restrictions on Use of Web Site
Ownership of Other Materials
Hyperlinks and Third-Party Content
Privacy and Security
Contents of the Web Site – Disclaimer
Operation of the Web Site – Disclaimer
Limitation of Liability
Integration and Severability
Indemnification
Choice of English Language

 
1. No Investment Advice or Recommendations  The M&P Web Site and its content are for information and education purposes only. You alone will need to evaluate the merits and risks associated with the use of the M&P Web Site.
Although this Web Site may provide information relating to approaches to investing or types of securities and investments you might buy or sell, no information available through the Web Site is intended or should be construed as an investment recommendation or endorsement from M&P. Nothing on this Web Site shall be considered a solicitation or offer to buy or sell any security, future, option or other financial instrument or to offer or provide any investment advice or service to any person in any jurisdiction where such solicitation or offer would be unlawful under the laws of such jurisdiction. Nothing contained on the Web Site constitutes investment advice and the views expressed on this Web Site should not be taken as advice to buy or sell any security. In preparing the information contained in this Web Site, M&P has not taken into account the investment needs, objectives and financial circumstances of any particular investor. You are advised not to rely on any information contained on this Web Site in the process of making an informed decision. Furthermore, no information or materials contained on this Web Site should be construed or relied upon as investment, legal, accounting, tax or other professional advice. Decisions based on information contained within the Web Site are your sole responsibility, and before making any decision on the basis of the information, you should consider with or without the assistance of a securities adviser or other adviser, whether the information is appropriate in light of your particular investment needs, objectives and financial circumstances. If you wish to obtain further details about any information contained on this Web Site, please contact M&P.
The Web Site may contain forward-looking statements, which reflect our current views with respect to, among other things, the operations and performance of our businesses. You can identify these forward-looking statements by the use of words such as “outlook,” “believe,” “expect,” “potential,” “continue,” “may,” “should,” “seek,” “approximately,” “predict,” “intend,” “will,” “plan,” “estimate,” “anticipate” or the negative version of these words or other comparable words. Forward-looking statements are subject to various risks and uncertainties. Accordingly, there are or will be important factors that could cause actual outcomes or results to differ materially from those indicated in these statements. We undertake no obligation to publicly update or review any forward-looking statement, whether as a result of new information, future developments or otherwise.
The views expressed on this Web Site were prepared by M&P based upon the information available at the time such views were written. Changed or additional information could cause such views to change.
Any past performance shown is not indicative of future results. No representation is being made that any investment or transaction will or is likely to achieve profits or losses similar to those achieved in the past, or that significant losses will be avoided. The investment return and principal value of an investment will fluctuate and, as a result, your redemption value may be more or less than original cost.
2.  Jurisdictional Issues and Applicable Law  M&P is an investment adviser registered with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940. Unless otherwise specified, M&P controls and operates this Web Site from our offices within the State of Delaware, United States of America. The services and products described and information provided on this Web Site are directed to, and are intended to be made available only to, persons in the United States and are not intended for distribution to, or use by, any person in any other country or any jurisdiction where such distribution or use would be contrary to law or regulation or that would subject M&P to any registration requirement within such jurisdiction or country. Unless otherwise expressly stated herein, M&P makes no representation that transactions, products or services discussed on or accessible through the Web Site are available or appropriate for sale or use in all jurisdictions or by all users, or that access by any user in the place it is located is not illegal or prohibited. Persons who access this Web Site do so on their own initiative and are responsible for compliance with applicable local laws or regulations. M&P reserves the right to limit access to this Web Site to any person, geographic region or jurisdiction.
M&P’s investment adviser representatives only may transact business in any state or province if they first are registered, or excluded or exempted from registration, under applicable laws of that state or province. Individualized, follow up responses will not be made, and additional information about M&P’s investment advisory services will not be provided, to persons in any state or province absent compliance with applicable laws or an exemption or exclusion therefrom.
The laws of the State of Delaware and applicable U.S. federal law shall govern these Terms. If you take legal action relating to these Terms, you agree to file such action only in state or federal court within the State of Delaware, and you consent and submit to the personal jurisdiction of those courts for the purposes of litigating any such action. If any part of these Terms is or becomes unlawful, void or unenforceable, that part will be deemed severable and will not affect the validity and enforceability of any remaining provisions. You agree that any cause of action you may have with respect to your use of this Web Site must be commenced within one (1) year after the claim or cause of action arises, or it will be deemed to have been waived.
3.  Modification of Terms and Web Site  M&P reserves the right, at our discretion, to change these Terms at any time. We suggest that you review these Terms periodically for changes. The Terms can be accessed from links on the home (or index) page and other pages of the M&P Web Site. If you use this Web Site after we post changes to these Terms, you accept the changed Terms. M&P may also offer other services from time to time that are governed by different terms and conditions. If you have an account with M&P, your customer relationship with M&P is also governed by other agreements, including your account agreement. M&P reserves the right to modify, suspend or discontinue this Web Site temporarily or permanently and with or without notice. M&P assumes no liability for any such modification, suspension or discontinuance.
4.  Monitoring of Web Site  M&P expressly reserves the right to monitor any and all use of this Web Site and to retain and review records of such use. M&P is under no obligation to do so and assumes no responsibility or liability arising from the use or operation of this Web Site, including any decision to undertake or not to undertake monitoring activities, either generally or in specific instances. Our communications via email are not encrypted. You acknowledge that there is a risk that data, including email, electronic communications, including wireless communications, and personal data, may be accessed by unauthorized third parties when communicated between you and M&P.
5. Trademarks, Copyrights and Restrictions on Use of Materials  M&P owns and operates this Web Site. MARVIN & PALMER, MARVIN & PALMER ASSOCIATES, INC. GLOBAL EQUITY MANAGEMENT and Design are trademarks or registered trademarks of Marvin & Palmer Associates, Inc. in the United States and other jurisdictions. All other product names, company names, marks, logos, and symbols are trademarks of their respective owners, as explicitly noted below under “Ownership of Other Materials.” Nothing contained in this Web Site should be construed as granting, by implication, estoppel, or otherwise, any license or right to use any trademark displayed on this Web Site without the written permission of M&P or such third party that may own the trademarks displayed in this Web Site. Images displayed in this Web Site are either the property of, or used with permission by, M&P. You are prohibited from using or authorizing the use of these images without the prior approval of M&P.
6.  Restrictions  Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, users and other web sites may not:
a. Copy, reproduce, republish, upload, post, transmit, or distribute in any way material from this Web Site in any manner inconsistent with the purposes for which it is offered by M&P to its clients, prospective clients or members of the general public.
b. Without M&P’s express written permission, copy, modify, or display M&P’s name or logo, or any text, graphic images, or other content from the M&P Web Site. (To obtain express written permission, you can send us an e-mail by clicking on the email address on the “Contact Us” page.)
c. Redeliver any of the pages, text, images, or other content of the M&P Web Site using “framing” technology without M&P’s express written permission.
d. Use devices (including software) that are designed to provide repeated automated access to MarvinandPalmer.com other than those made generally available by M&P.
e. Include “M&P”, “Marvin & Palmer”, any other M&P trademark, the name of any M&P personnel, or any variation of any of the foregoing, as a metatag, hidden textual element, or any other indicator that may create a false or misleading impression of affiliation, sponsorship, or endorsement between any user and/or site and M&P.
f. Collect or store personal data about other users of this Web Site.
g. Upload, e-mail or otherwise transmit any advertising, promotional or other material in a manner that would constitute a violation of the CAN-SPAM Act of 2003 (Controlling the Assault of Non-Solicited Pornography and Marketing Act) or similar state law.
h. Upload, email or otherwise transmit any material that contains viruses, worms, time bombs or any other similar system or computer code, files or programs that might interrupt, limit or interfere with the functionality of any computer software or hardware or the telecommunications equipment that is owned, leased or used by M&P.
i. Interfere with the functioning of this Web Site or restrict or inhibit others from using this Web Site.
j. Create a link to the M&P Web Site unless any such link satisfies all of the following requirements:
i.  Resolves to M&P’s homepage at www.MarvinandPalmer.com.
ii. Indicates clearly that the link will lead to the web site of “Marvin & Palmer Associates, Inc.”
iii. Does not falsely or misleadingly represent or suggest any relationship between the linking site and M&P (including suggestions of affiliation, endorsement, or sponsorship).
         iv. Delivers M&P’s content outside of a framed environment.
          v. Maintains the integrity of M&P’s layout, content, and look and feel.
          vi. Delivers users to the M&P Web Site, unaltered, unmodified, unadulterated in any way by the linking site.
k. Gain or attempt to gain access (or encourage others to gain or attempt to gain access) to the identities, information or computers of others through this Web Site.
l. Violate or attempt to violate (or encourage others to violate or attempt to violate) any law, regulation, rule, the intellectual property or contractual rights of others, or the security of this Web Site.
7. Ownership of Other Materials

The MSCI World Index, the MSCI EAFE Index, the MSCI Emerging Markets Free Index are products of Morgan Stanley Capital International Inc.
The Standard and Poor’s 500 is the product of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc.
AIMR-PPSTM and GIPSTM are the trademarks of the CFA Institute.
Adobe®, Acrobat®, Acrobat® Reader, and the Acrobat logo are trademarks of Adobe Systems Incorporated.
Frank Russell is a trademark of the Frank Russell Company.
Russell 1000® Growth Index is a trademark/service mark of the Frank Russell Company. Russell® is a trademark of the Frank Russell Company.

 
8.  Hyperlinks and Third-Party Content  
M&P does not review or monitor any websites linked from or to this Web Site and is not responsible for the content of any such websites. Accordingly, M&P cannot be held responsible for the information, materials, products or services obtained on or from such other websites, nor will we be liable in any respect whatsoever for any damages arising from your access to such websites. Any links from or to other websites are provided merely for the convenience of the users of this Web Site and the inclusion of these links does not imply an endorsement, representation or warranty by M&P with respect to any such linked websites or the content, products or services contained or accessible through such websites or their operators. M&P DISCLAIMS RESPONSIBILITY FOR THE PRIVACY POLICIES AND CUSTOMER INFORMATION PRACTICES OF THIRD- PARTY INTERNET WEBSITES HYPERLINKED FROM THIS WEB SITE. M&P is not responsible for content that appears on MarvinandPalmer.com that may be provided by a third party. Your following links from or to such websites is at your sole risk.
9.  Privacy and Security  
Subject to any applicable Terms in M&P’s Web Site Privacy & Security Statement, any communication or other material that you send to us through the Internet or post on this Web Site by electronic mail or otherwise, is and will be deemed to be non- confidential as between you and M&P. M&P shall have no obligation of any kind with respect to such information. M&P will be free to use, for any purpose, and without compensation due or payable to you, any ideas, concepts, know-how or techniques provided by you to M&P through this Web Site. For information on how M&P uses and protects the personal information you may provide on this Web Site, please click on this link to M&P’s Web Site Privacy & Security Statement. You may not use this Web Site to collect or harvest personal information about other persons or otherwise use this Web Site in a manner that is inconsistent with their privacy or personal data protection rights.
Click here to view the General Privacy & Security Statement.
10.  Contents of the Web Site – Disclaimer  
THE MATERIALS IN THIS WEB SITE (INCLUDING ANY GRAPHICS) AND ANY MATERIALS MADE AVAILABLE THROUGH THIS WEB SITE ARE PROVIDED “AS IS” AND “AS AVAILABLE” AND WITHOUT WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EITHER EXPRESS OR IMPLIED. TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMISSIBLE PURSUANT TO APPLICABLE LAW, M&P DISCLAIMS ALL WARRANTIES, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, ALL IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, TITLE AND NON-INFRINGEMENT. THE DATA PROVIDED IN THIS WEB SITE IS OBTAINED FROM A VARIETY OF SOURCES THAT ARE BELIEVED TO BE ACCURATE. HOWEVER, THE ACCURACY OR COMPLETENESS CANNOT BE GUARANTEED. M&P DOES NOT WARRANT OR MAKE ANY REPRESENTATIONS REGARDING THE USE OR THE RESULTS OF THE USE OF THE MATERIALS IN THIS WEB SITE IN TERMS OF THEIR COMPLETENESS, ACCURACY, TIMELINESS, RELIABILITY, OR OTHERWISE. THE MATERIALS IN THIS WEB SITE COULD INCLUDE TECHNICAL INACCURACIES OR TYPOGRAPHICAL ERRORS. THESE MATERIALS COULD BECOME INACCURATE AS A RESULT OF DEVELOPMENTS OCCURRING AFTER THEIR RESPECTIVE DATES. M&P UNDERTAKES NO OBLIGATION TO MAINTAIN THE CURRENCY OF SUCH INFORMATION.
CERTAIN LINKS IN THIS WEB SITE MAY LINK YOU TO OTHER SITES ON THE WORLD WIDE WEB. THE LINKED SITES ARE NOT UNDER THE CONTROL OF M&P AND M&P IS NOT RESPONSIBLE FOR THE CONTENTS OF ANY LINKED SITE OR ANY LINK CONTAINED IN A LINKED SITE OR ANY CHANGES OR UPDATES TO SUCH SITES. M&P IS NOT RESPONSIBLE FOR WEBCASTING OR ANY OTHER FORM OF TRANSMISSION RECEIVED FROM ANY LINKED SITE. M&P IS PROVIDING THESE LINKS TO YOU ONLY AS A CONVENIENCE, AND THE INCLUSION OF ANY LINK DOES NOT IMPLY A REFERRAL BY M&P TO, OR AN ENDORSEMENT BY M&P OF, THE LINKED SITE.
11.  Operation of the Web Site – Disclaimer  
M&P ENDEAVORS TO MAINTAIN THIS WEB SITE AND ITS OPERATION, BUT IS NOT, AND CANNOT BE, RESPONSIBLE FOR THE RESULTS OF ANY DEFECTS THAT MAY EXIST IN THE WEB SITE OR ITS OPERATION. AS TO THE OPERATION OF THE WEB SITE, M&P EXPRESSLY DISCLAIMS ALL WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, WHETHER EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. M&P MAKES NO WARRANTY THAT (i) THE OPERATION OF THE WEB SITE WILL MEET THE USER’S REQUIREMENTS; (ii) ACCESS TO THE WEB SITE WILL BE UNINTERRUPTED, TIMELY, SECURE, FREE OF VIRUSES OR OTHER HARMFUL COMPONENTS, OR FREE OF ERRORS; (iii) THE RESULTS THAT MAY BE OBTAINED FROM THE USE OF THE WEB SITE WILL BE ACCURATE OR RELIABLE; OR (iv) DEFECTS WILL BE CORRECTED. YOU (AND NOT M&P) ASSUME THE ENTIRE COST OF ALL SERVICING, REPAIR, OR CORRECTION THAT MAY BE NECESSARY FOR YOUR COMPUTER EQUIPMENT AND SOFTWARE AS A RESULT OF ANY VIRUSES, ERRORS OR OTHER PROBLEMS YOU MAY HAVE AS A RESULT OF VISITING THIS WEB SITE.
12.  Limitation of Liability  
UNDER NO CIRCUMSTANCES SHALL M&P OR ANY REPRESENTATIVE BE LIABLE FOR ANY DAMAGES OR INJURY, INCLUDING ANY DIRECT, SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL, CONSEQUENTIAL OR PUNITIVE DAMAGES OR ANY LOSS OF PROFITS, GOODWILL, USE, DATA OR OTHER INTANGIBLE LOSSES, THAT MAY RESULT FROM THE USE OF, OR THE INABILITY TO USE, THE MATERIALS IN THIS WEB SITE, WHETHER IN AN ACTION OF CONTRACT, NEGLIGENCE OR OTHER TORTUOUS ACTION, ARISING OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE USE OR PERFORMANCE OF INFORMATION AVAILABLE IN THE WEB SITE. NEITHER M&P NOR ANY REPRESENTATIVE SHALL BE LIABLE EVEN IF M&P OR A REPRESENTATIVE HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES. THESE INCLUDE, BUT ARE NOT LIMITED TO, DAMAGES OR INJURY CAUSED BY ERROR, OMISSION, INTERRUPTION, DEFECT, FAILURE OF PERFORMANCE, DELAY IN OPERATION OR TRANSMISSION, LINE FAILURE OR COMPUTER VIRUS OR OTHER HARMFUL COMPONENT.
13.  Integration and Severability  
THESE TERMS REPRESENT THE ENTIRE AGREEMENT BETWEEN M&P AND THE USER RELATING TO THE SUBJECT MATTER HEREIN.
APPLICABLE LAW IN SOME JURISDICTIONS MAY NOT ALLOW THE EXCLUSION OF CERTAIN WARRANTIES OR THE LIMITATION OR EXCLUSION OF LIABILITY FOR INCIDENTAL OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES. ACCORDINGLY, SOME OF THE ABOVE LIMITATIONS OR EXCLUSIONS MAY NOT APPLY TO YOU. HOWEVER, IN SUCH CIRCUMSTANCES THE LIABILITY OF M&P OR ANY REPRESENTATIVE IS LIMITED TO THE GREATEST EXTENT ALLOWABLE UNDER APPLICABLE LAW IN SUCH JURISDICTIONS AND IN NO EVENT SHALL THE TOTAL LIABILITY TO YOU OR M&P OR ANY REPRESENTATIVE FOR DAMAGES, LOSSES, AND CAUSES OF ACTION (WHETHER IN CONTRACT, TORT (INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, NEGLIGENCE), OR OTHERWISE) EXCEED THE AMOUNT PAID BY YOU, IF ANY, FOR ACCESSING THIS SITE.
14.  Indemnification  
AS CONSIDERATION FOR ACCESSING THIS WEB SITE, YOU AGREE TO INDEMNIFY AND HOLD M&P AND ITS REPRESENTATIVES HARMLESS FROM ANY CLAIM, DEMAND, LOSS, COSTS OR EXPENSE, INCLUDING ATTORNEYS’ FEES, MADE BY ANY PERSON ARISING OUT OF YOUR VIOLATION OF THESE TERMS, STATE OR FEDERAL SECURITIES LAWS OR REGULATIONS, OR ANY OTHER PERSON’S RIGHTS, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, INFRINGEMENT OF ANY COPYRIGHT OR VIOLATION OF ANY PROPRIETARY OR PRIVACY RIGHT.
15.  Choice of English Language  
The parties have requested that these Terms and Conditions and all documents contemplated hereby be drawn up in English. Les parties aux présentes ont exigé que cette entente et tous autres documents envisagés par les presésentes soient rédigés en anglais.
16.  COPYRIGHT NOTICE.
Copyright© 2001-2013 Marvin & Palmer Associates, Inc., 1201 N. Market Street, Suite 2300, Wilmington, Delaware 19801-1165. All rights reserved.

General Privacy & Security Statement
Revised on June 28, 2013
The Web Site you have entered is operated by and on behalf of Marvin & Palmer Associates, Inc. (“M&P”). M&P provides global equity investment management services and manages and advises certain limited partnerships and commingled funds. Currently M&P collects only minimal Personal Information through its Web Site. However, this General Privacy & Security Statement is posted on this Web Site because of the great importance M&P places on the privacy and information security of its current and former investors and clients, as well as prospective investors and clients.
Click here for an Overview of M&P
This General Privacy and Security Statement (this “Statement”):

outlines the types of Personal Information that is collected by M&P through this Web Site and by other means;
tells you how we use and protect Personal Information;
tells you what to do if you do not want your Personal Information collected when you visit this Web Site or otherwise provide information to us; and
tells you how you can change Personal Information you have already provided to us.

By using this Web Site, you signify that you agree with the terms of this Statement as amended from time to time and as posted in this area of this Web Site. By using this Web Site and providing your Personal Information to us you consent to our collection of your Personal Information and our use of it in accordance with this Statement. If you do not agree with any term in this Statement, please do not use this Web Site or otherwise provide Personal Information to us.
This Web Site promotes financial services offered in accordance with the laws and regulations of the United States and is intended for viewing only by residents of that jurisdiction.
You may be able to access other web sites by clicking on links that we have provided on this Web Site. You should be aware that other web sites are not subject to our privacy standards and procedures. You will need to contact those web sites or their operators directly to ascertain their privacy standards.
M&P reserves the right to change or remove this Statement at our discretion. If we decide to change this Statement, we will post those changes at an appropriate place on our Web Site. We encourage you to visit this area frequently to stay informed. If you access this Web Site after we have posted changes to this Statement, you are agreeing to accept the changes.
Who is Covered by This Statement:
This Statement applies to individuals who provide Personal Information through this Web Site to M&P or otherwise, who apply to invest in or who invest in one of the limited partnerships or commingled funds sponsored by M&P (“Investment Funds”) or who are prospective clients of, or who have accounts managed by, M&P.
What is Personal Information:
This Statement describes our policies and practices for collecting, using, disclosing, retaining, and safeguarding “nonpublic personal information”, which may include information about investors and clients as identifiable individuals, such as name, street address, social security number or other national identification number, income, assets information, financial interests and objectives, account balances, and investment history (“Personal Information”).
Where the Personal Information Comes From:
We collect Personal Information from the following sources: (1) Personal Information provided to us on subscription agreements, other agreements and related forms that investors and clients complete and send to us, (2) Personal Information provided to us by using this Web Site and (3) Personal Information that is created about investors and clients as we administer their interest in the Investment Funds or their account. Some of this information may be obtained from third-party providers.
Our Assurances about Privacy and Security for Personal Information
1.  Priority:
Protecting privacy is a top priority. We are committed to protecting privacy. If you have any questions or concerns about how we treat your Personal Information, please let us know using one of the methods listed under How to Reach Us so that we can address them
2.  Notice:
We will give investors and clients notice of our privacy policy annually, and we will provide prompt notice if we make material changes. In addition to providing this Statement, we distribute a written Privacy Policy to investors and clients when they open an account with us and at least annually thereafter. We reserve the right to change this Statement and our Privacy Policy at any time. If we make material changes to this Statement or to the Privacy Policy, including material changes or additions to the purposes for which we collect, use, disclose or retain Personal Information, we will post the changes or additions here. We also will tell investors and clients promptly and, if required, seek their consent.
3.  Choice:
We will give investors and clients certain choices regarding our collection, use and disclosure of their Personal Information. We will use Personal Information only as provided in this Statement and our Privacy Policy and only in accordance with the choices our investors and clients have made. We describe below in Section 4 (Limits on Collection, Use and Disclosure) how we may collect, use and disclose Personal Information. Investors and clients can choose, at any time, to opt out of receiving the communications described under the heading “Other Communications” in Section 4. In addition, if we are required to seek their consent, investors and clients can choose to opt out of material changes or additions that we propose to make to the purposes for which we collect, use, disclose or retain their Personal Information. Investors and clients can let us know by printing out, completing and returning the attached Reply Form  or by using any one of the other methods listed under How to Reach Us. Investors and clients can change their decision as often as they like.
An investor who holds an interest in an Investment Fund jointly with one or more other persons has the right to make the decisions concerning the use of Personal Information that pertains to himself or herself alone. When investors hold an interest jointly, each acting alone has the right to make decisions concerning the use of the information that pertains to those persons together. If there is a delegation of authority to any one of the joint accountholders, that person, acting alone, may make decisions concerning the use of all Personal Information of all joint accountholders, and any decision by that person will be controlling. A separate form of consent will be needed to set up a delegation of authority.
4.  Limits on Collection, Use and Disclosure:
We limit our collection, use and disclosure of Personal Information to what is necessary to run our business and to deliver superior service.  In General. We will collect, use and disclose Personal Information for the following purposes: (1) to respond to inquiries received through the e-mail facility in our Web Site, (2) to establish and maintain an account, (3) communicate with clients and investors about their account, related matters and other matters, (4) to effect, administer and enforce a transaction involving or related to an account that the client or investor requests or authorizes, (5) to identify the client or investor in order to protect against fraud and guard against unauthorized access to their accounts, (6) to keep our information about clients and investors current and accurate, (7) to determine whether prospective investors are qualified under the securities laws to purchase an interest in the Investment Funds, (8) to facilitate the preparation and filing of tax information and financial statements, (9) to perform necessary credit checks or collect or report debts owed to us, (10) to protect our rights or property, (11) upon reasonable request by the Investment Fund in which an investor has chosen to invest and (12) otherwise to provide quality service to our clients and investors (including processing and storage of their Personal Information in any of our offices world-wide). To do these things we may share Personal Information with service providers, such as accountants, lawyers, trustees, custodians and registered agents, which may be based anywhere in the world. Information will be used only for the purposes for which it is disclosed and will be retained by those service providers, and by us, for as long as may be necessary to fulfill these purposes or for a longer time if required by applicable law. To better service our investors and clients, we may combine information they give to us through various communications channels.
Our Investors and Clients.
We communicate with our investors and clients by mail, overnight service, telephone, fax and e-mail. We use these communications to fulfill our obligations to our investors and clients under our agreements with them. Our use of these communications reflects any consents our investors and clients may have given in those agreements. We reserve the right to use any of these means to send to them information relating to their account, including communications required by law.
Marketing Lists.
We do not sell, rent, or otherwise transfer lists of our investors and clients who are individuals to another party for the marketing purposes of that party. Sometimes we may create and transfer such lists of our investors and clients that are institutions for those purposes. We do not use Personal Information about investors or clients to conduct market research. We use the names of investors and clients that are institutions in our presentations and as references, but only when we have their permission to do so.
Other Communications.
At times we may send information to investors and clients that does not concern their accounts. If investors and clients do not want to receive these communications from us, they may let us know by printing out, completing and returning the Reply Form  or by using any one of the other methods listed under How to Reach Us. We will also include in each of these communications information on how investors and clients may opt out of receiving further communications of this type.
5.  Releasing Personal Information:
We will protect the confidentiality of Personal Information. We do not sell, rent or give away Personal Information to anyone. We do not exchange Personal Information with anyone. We will release Personal Information about an investor or client only (1) to a person we believe to be them or their authorized representative, (2) to someone else if investor or client directs us to do so, (3) to a service provider, such as an accountant or another third party for the purposes of administering investor’s or client’s application or account, or (4) in the limited circumstances described below. We expect the service providers who receive Personal Information from us to comply with our privacy and information security standards.We reserve the right to disclose or report Personal Information when (1) we believe in good faith that reporting is required or permitted under law, (2) to cooperate with regulators or law enforcement authorities, (3) to perform necessary credit checks or collect or report debts owed to us, (4) to protect our rights or property or (5) upon reasonable request by the Investment Fund in which an investor have chosen to invest.
Applicable laws give people who are involved in lawsuits or other legal proceedings the right to require us to provide information to them. In such cases, we provide only the information that we are required or authorized to provide.
6.  Access and Accuracy:
We will provide investor and clients with access to their Personal Information, and we will work with them to keep their Personal Information accurate. Investors and clients may let us know by using any of the methods listed under How to Reach Us (1) if they wish to access their Personal Information that we hold, (2) if they find an error in their Personal Information, or (3) if they need to make a change in their Personal Information. We will provide access or update our records promptly after hearing from them. Please allow approximately 10 business days for any information to be received or any changes to be made.
7.  Security:
We maintain safeguards to protect Personal Information. We employ physical, electronic and procedural safeguards to help protect Personal Information. Personal Information about investors and clients is normally used only by those employees of M&P who need to know it in order to provide services to the investor or client. We require all employees not to use or disclose Personal Information except for our business purposes, and we require employees to safeguard such information. Any employee who violates these requirements or our Privacy Policy will be subject to discipline.When we share Personal Information with our service providers, we expect them (1) not to use such information for their own purposes, (2) to keep such information confidential, and (3) to retain such information no longer than is necessary to provide the product, service, or information.We employ user authentication systems (such as passwords) and access control mechanisms to secure access to our computer systems and files. We employ isolation equipment for our Internet-based systems. Please note that our communications by e-mail are not encrypted.Any investor or client who becomes aware of any suspicious activity regarding his or her account should let us know immediately.
8.  Cookies: 
This Web Site does not use cookies or any similar technology, such as “clear gifs,” “web beacons” or “web bugs.” A cookie is a small file that is sent to your computer by a web site’s server. A cookie can be a record of your visit to a site, including information such as your User Name, registration information, time of last visit, and pages viewed.
Reply Form














Our History | Marvin & Palmer









































About M&P
Our History
Our Strengths




Our History
After years of working together and collaborating on investment decisions for large institutions, David Marvin and Stanley Palmer founded Marvin & Palmer Associates (M&P) in 1986.
Mr. Marvin and Mr. Palmer have worked together since 1971. Before forming M&P, they both worked at E. I. du Pont de Nemours & Company. Mr. Marvin served for ten years as Vice President in charge of the $10 billion internally managed DuPont pension fund. Mr. Palmer served for seven years as an International Equity Portfolio Manager. Before their tenure at DuPont, they worked at Investors Diversified Services (now a part of Ameriprise Financial).
Learn more about David Marvin and Stanley Palmer















Our Team | Marvin & Palmer









































Our Team
Marvin & Palmer Associates (M&P) uses a team management approach. The portfolio managers focus on specific geographic regions while remaining generalists in their approach to sectors.



Portfolio Management
With decades of experience among them, M&P’s team of portfolio managers follows a rigorous investment process that has been a hallmark of the firm’s success.
Meet the Team


Advisory Board
Our world-class Advisory Board is a distinctive group of reputable business and political leaders who provide insights into the economic and geopolitical landscape.
Meet the Board











Marvin & Palmer Associates, Inc. : Top Money Managers  






Page Not Found - Relationship Science


























































                      NEWS HOME
                    

Advertising
Board and Executive Moves
Energy
Health Care
Hedge Funds
M & A
Private Equity
Technology







Page Not Found

Oops! Looks like you followed a bad link.

Click here to start over.









Are you a RelSci Pro Subscriber?

Login to RelSci Pro 
                        ➤


Not a Pro Subscriber? Log in here to manage your alerts









 Keep me signed in.
        

Login  ➤



        Forgot your Password?
    

























 I have read the LexisNexis terms & conditions




Sign Me Up  ➤















	MARVIN & PALMER Trademark of Marvin & Palmer Associates, Inc.. Serial Number: 76217587 :: Trademarkia Trademarks





























































Apply Online!
Attorneys

Services 

U.S. Trademark Registration Service 
International Trademark Registration Service 
Trademark Office Action Response 
Trademark Statement of Use 
Trademark Renewal 
Trademark Assignment 
Trademark Watch 
Trademark Cease & Desist  
Trademark Comprehensive Search  
Copyright Registration 
Patent Services 
Incorporation Services 
Business Page Creation 
 More Services... 


Help
Contact Us


Login






















Trademark Search 
Trademark Category
Insurance & Financial Services
MARVIN & PALMER










 
Get FREE email alerts













MARVIN & PALMER  Trademark Information
 Marvin & Palmer Associates, Inc.
Investment advisory, management and supervisory services provided to institutional clients for both domestic and foreign investments in equity securities, debt securities, options on securities, over-the-counter derivatives, and forward foreign exchange contracts; Investment brokerage, namely sponsoring and selling, directly or indirectly, interests in private investment funds that invest in both domestic and foreign equity securities, debt se...




Perfect for these industries

Insurance & Financial Services





Words that describe this mark
investment   advisory      management   supervisory   services   provided   institutional   clients   domestic   foreign   investments   equity   securities      debt   securities      options   securities      overthecounter   derivatives      forward   foreign    
                                    




This is a brand page for the MARVIN & PALMER trademark by Marvin & Palmer Associates, Inc. 
                                in Wilmington, DE, 198093727.
Write a review about a product or service associated with this MARVIN & PALMER trademark.    
                                Or, contact the owner Marvin & Palmer Associates, Inc. of the MARVIN & PALMER trademark by filing a request to communicate with    
                                the Legal Correspondent for licensing, use, and/or questions related to the MARVIN & PALMER trademark.
                           






On Wednesday, February 28, 2001,  a U.S. federal trademark registration was filed for 
                        MARVIN & PALMER by 
                        Marvin & Palmer Associates, Inc., Wilmington, DE  198093727.
                        The USPTO has given the MARVIN & PALMER 
                        trademark serial  number of  76217587.  
                        The current federal status of this trademark filing is REGISTERED AND RENEWED.
                        The correspondent listed for MARVIN & PALMER is 
                        
                        
                                            Beth H. Alter of 
                                            Seward & Kissel LLP,  One Battery Park Plaza, New York NY 10004 
                                .
                            The MARVIN & PALMER trademark is filed in the category of 
                            
                                    Insurance & Financial Services
                                . 
                            The description provided to the USPTO for MARVIN & PALMER 
                            is Investment advisory, management and supervisory services provided to institutional clients for both domestic and foreign investments in equity securities, debt securities, options on securities, over-the-counter derivatives, and forward foreign exchange contracts; Investment brokerage, namely sponsoring and selling, directly or indirectly, interests in private investment funds that invest in both domestic and foreign equity securities, debt securities, options on securities, over-the-counter derivates, and forward foreign exchange contracts; investment advisory and management services, namely managing client securities, portfolios and accounts. 
                            





Word mark:
 MARVIN & PALMER


  Status/Status Date:  


REGISTERED AND RENEWED

7/11/2012



  Serial Number:  
76217587


  Filing Date:  
2/28/2001


 Registration Number:  
2609187 


 Registration Date:  
8/20/2002


 Goods and Services: 
Investment advisory, management and supervisory services provided to institutional clients for both domestic and foreign investments in equity securities, debt securities, options on securities, over-the-counter derivatives, and forward foreign exchange contracts; Investment brokerage, namely sponsoring and selling, directly or indirectly, interests in private investment funds that invest in both domestic and foreign equity securities, debt securities, options on securities, over-the-counter derivates, and forward foreign exchange contracts; investment advisory and management services, namely managing client securities, portfolios and accounts


 Mark Description: 
NOT AVAILABLE


 Type Of Mark: 
Service Mark


 Published For Opposition Date: 
5/28/2002


Last Applicant/Owner:

Marvin & Palmer Associates, Inc.Wilmington, DE  198093727
Why is this contact information displayed?  

Why is this contact information displayed? [Close]
The USPTO makes this data available for search by the public so that individuals can locate ownership information for intellectual property, much the same way a county might make real estate property ownership information available.
Since our website is synchronized with the USPTO data, we recommend making any data changes with the USPTO directly. Our website will auto-update when the USPTO data is updated.
You may also contact Trademarkia to make a request for the removal of your personally identifiable information or trademark data.  Such requests must be made in writing and will be subject to verification of ownership.  This policy allows verified trademark owners to specify: (A) that their identifiable information be masked, or (B) that their trademark pages permanently deleted from Trademarkia.com.  
                                                Requests may be made directly to customer.service@trademarkia.com and every effort will be made to honor them within 48 hours. 
Click here for further details.
[Close]




 Mark Drawing Code:  
Typeset (Words/letter/Number)


 Design Search: 


(NO DATA)



Register Type:  
Principal


 Disclaimer:
 (NOT AVAILABLE)


 Correspondent:


Beth H. Alter
Seward & Kissel LLP
One Battery Park Plaza
New York NY 10004






 Use in Commerce Trademark - Applicant has provided proof of use of this mark in commerce to USPTO.





Classification Information



Primary Class: 
 Class (036) - Insurance; financial affairs; monetary affairs; real estate affairs. 


First Use Anywhere: 
6/23/1986


First Use In Commerce: 
7/1/1986





Trademarkia is the largest search engine for U.S. trademarks.  Each month hundreds of trademarks around the world are filed by licensed attorneys in the LegalForce/Trademarkia network! You can register your trademark in 170+ countries in the world through LegalForce Network.
 LegalForce Network can help you incorporate a business around your MARVIN & PALMER trademark in less than 5 minutes.  Trademarkia makes the process easy and convenient, so start now!
 Trademarkia.com is a free search engine of publicly available government records.  Trademarkia.com is not a law firm and does not represent owners & correspondents listed on this page.
Trademark Document Retrieval >>







Trademark - Apply Online!


100% Satisfaction Guarantee protect your valuable brand now.



How it works?
What you get?






1. Legalforce RAPC - #1 U.S. Trademark Filing from 2010 to now.
2. Describe how your business or product is being used. Register your mark in 176+ countries. Just $199 + govt fees! Start here >>






1. Top Global IP Attorneys - Credibility and Experience!
2. All processes will be performed in a timely manner. You will be informed periodically about the process.






Keep Track of this Brand.

 Trademark Watch Services
Keep track of how your trademark is being used. Available in the United States and in more than 176 countries. Round-the-clock monitoring. Monthly report on potential infringement.
                                

Watch this Trademark 

Trademark Watch Services read more...

Current Trademark Status:

7/11/2012
REGISTERED AND RENEWED


Free Trademark Search:






Correspondent Search:



Beth H. Alter


                                             
                                         is a correspondent of MARVIN & PALMER trademark. 
                            	    


Current Overall Rating:

 (0 review)
                            
What You Can Do:




Start Your Business



FREE Logo Creator



Add to Favorites



View Documents



FREE Trademark Search



Start Trademark Filing Process



Protect this Mark Internationally



Custom Logo Design $159



Search marvinpalmer on popular social networks






                                Trademarkia lets you see how your 
                                personal name, product name, 
                                trademark name or username is being used on any of 530+ new 
                                and popular social networks.  
                                Be the first to reserve your name  and get help stopping others from using it - all in one place!















Trademark Oppose Service


You can request for Extension of Time to Oppose this mark or Oppose it now.



                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password;
                 

                 - If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password.
                


* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



* 



 Please enter the value




 

  
                             



 







Status Update Alerts

Status Update Alerts are email updates of the latest trademark status change. Please make sure you provide the correct email. 


                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password;
                 

                 - If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password.
                


* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



* 



 Please enter the value




 

  
                             



 









Review & Rating

Please Rate and Review for MARVIN & PALMER 




MARVIN & PALMER is providing Investment advisory, management and supervisory services provided to institutional clients for both domestic and foreign investments in equity securities, debt securities, options on securities, over-the-counter derivatives, and forward foreign exchange contracts; Investment brokerage, namely sponsoring and selling, directly or indirectly, interests in private investment funds that invest in both domestic and foreign equity securities, debt securities, options on securities, over-the-counter ....
                


                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password to be associated with your review.
                 

                 If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password before posting your review.
                 


* Please Rate: 


     




* Your Review: 



 Please enter your review.



* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



 

  
                             



 






















Marvin & Palmer Associates Inc in Wilmington, DE 19801 - ChamberofCommerce.com




   =     


        









Sign Up
Sign In
Contact Us


 














Search
 

near
 













Home
» Delaware
» Wilmington
» Portfolio Management & Investment Services
» Marvin & Palmer Associates Inc













Marvin & Palmer Associates Inc


0 Reviews

0.0000 stars - based on 0 reviews
                            





1201 N Market St Ste 2300 Wilmington, Delaware 19801


(302) 573-3570


 



 

Print |
                Save |
                Directions


About
Marvin & Palmer Associates Inc is located at the address 1201 N Market St in Wilmington, Delaware 19801.  They can be contacted via phone at (302) 573-3570 for pricing, hours and directions.  Marvin & Palmer Associates Inc has an annual sales volume of 5M – 9,999,999.  .For more information contact C  Schutt, Vice PresidentMarvin & Palmer Associates Inc provides Replacements, Towing, Estimates to it's customers.  For maps and directions to Marvin & Palmer Associates Inc view the map to the right.  For reviews of Marvin & Palmer Associates Inc see below.









Business Features

PRODUCTS


Generators
, Metal
, Hand Pallet Trucks
, Dollies
, Welding Equipment
, Janitorial Products
, Parts & Accessories
, Parts
, Fasteners
, Abrasives



SERVICES


Bearings
, Replacements
, Industrial Services
, Residential Projects
, Financing Available
, Design & Engineering
, Heat Treating
, Maintenance
, Estimates
, Towing



 


Information

CONTACT INFORMATION
Phone: (302) 573-3570
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION:
Employee Size: 50 To 99
Exact Employee Count: 50
Exact Sales Volume: 750-0000
Location Type: Single Location
Sales Volume: 5M – 9,999,999
CATEGORIES:


Portfolio Management & Investment Services
Industrial Machinery & Equipment Manufacturing & Wholesale
Business, Industry & Agriculture
Finance
Investments & Securities
Commercial Equipment Manufacturing & Wholesale



People Also Viewed


Sidell Financial Management


1702 Lovering Ave  Wilmington, Delaware 19806




JPL Asset Management & Planning


1303 Delaware Ave Ste 112 Ste 112 Wilmington, Delaware 19806




Jones Investment Co.


1007 N Orange St Ste 225 Wilmington, Delaware 19801




C B DELAWARE INVESTMENTS INC


1105 N Market St  Wilmington, Delaware 19801




Chusa Equity Investors III LP


  Wilmington, Delaware 19801




Crowley Group


3201 Millcreek Rd # B Wilmington, Delaware 19808





Reviews

Add


You must Sign in to post reviews.





by  on 






Click here to be the first to review this business...



0 Reviews
 


Key Contacts




C  Schutt
Vice President
Phone: (302) 573-3570 
 



Jay  Middleton
Senior Vice President And Portfolio Manager
Phone: (302) 573-3570 
 



Lars  Harrison
PORTFOLIO MANAGER
Phone: 302573 891 
 



Bonnie  Kitts
President
Phone: (302) 573-3570 
 



Jonathan  Friedman
CONTROLLER
Phone: 302573 891 
 



Karen  Buckley
MANAGER
Phone: (302) 573-3570 
 



View More
 























 






Site Map
FAQ
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
About
Partners
Chamber Partner Program
Chamber Member Benefits




Top Cities:
Atlanta
Bronx
Brooklyn
Chicago
Cleveland
Dallas
Denver
Detroit
Houston
Las Vegas
Los Angeles
Miami
Minneapolis
New York
Philadelphia
Phoenix
Saint Louis
San Antonio
San Diego
San Jose


© 2017 CHAMBEROFCOMMERCE.COM





















Marvin & Palmer Associates, Inc | Email CEO @marvinandpalmer.com CFO 

















































LOGIN

7 DAY FREE TRIAL





















































 




                    Marvin & Palmer Associates, Inc





marvinandpalmer.com







Wilmington, DE 19801
Phone: 302 573-3570
Fax: N/A










 














Type:

                    Private                
Employees:

100 - 249

Revenue: 

2.5 - 5 Million

Industry:  
                    Finance->Investment Bank/Brokerage                
SIC Code:  
                     Unavailable 
















View:




Employees



IT Intelligence



News



Currently Hiring




Historical Trends









 IT INTELLIGENCE











No Categories





No Products Found












Helpful Hint
The Inside View displays a list of technologies and products used internally at a company




                        F
                        i
                        r
                        e
                        w
                        a
                        l
                        l
                  








Show All CDN
CMS










Google Ajax
The AJAX Code Playground is an educational tool to show code examples for various Google Javascript APIs.






WordPress
WordPress - popular blogging platform



Sign up to see all













Helpful Hint
The Outside View displays all the technologies and devices which can be seen on the Internet





 NEWS AND BACKGROUND
 NEWS AND BACKGROUND







NO PRESS EVENTS







Background

                                       Full company description is available with the free trial.            


















Name 
Email Address
Department 
Get Data





No Records Found.







Showing 1 to 
                1                                

                                    of 12 entries            









 LEVEL AND ORGANIZATION
 LEVEL AND ORGANIZATION












 HISTORICAL TRENDS
 HISTORICAL TRENDS

















Weekly


Quarterly









































 
Poll Question
Date Created
Current Result
Votes








Only for logged in user.




Additional Info:
Lead411 offers quality contact information on a variety of companies including that of Marvin & Palmer Associates, Inc's CEO . The company profile also contains facebook info, linkedin accounts, phone numbers, cfo contacts, and Marvin & Palmer Associates, Inc email addresses with the domain format of @marvinandpalmer.com. Marvin & Palmer Associates, Inc, is in the Investment bank/brokerage field.  If you sign up for our free trial you will see our email@marvinandpalmer.com addresses.


Company Background:
Full company description is available with the free trial.


Similar Companies:
Affinity Wealth Management
If you don't want to waste too much time looking for company information regarding Affinity Wealth Management, a Investment bank/brokerage company, check out their Lead411 profile. Our profiles have linkedin data, phone numbers, cfo contacts, and more. It contains helpful contact information regarding top company officials, including that of Affinity Wealth Management's CEO , and other Affinity Wealth Management email format addresses within the @affinitywealth.com domain. Affinity Wealth Management is based in Wilmington, DE.  If you sign up for our free trial you will see our email@affinitywealth.com addresses.
Asset Management Alliance
Lead411 offers quality contact information on a variety of companies including that of Asset Management Alliance's CEO . The company profile also contains facebook info, linkedin accounts, phone numbers, cfo contacts, and Asset Management Alliance email addresses with the domain format of @assetmanagementalliance.com. Asset Management Alliance, is in the Investment bank/brokerage field.  If you sign up for our free trial you will see our email@assetmanagementalliance.com addresses.
Coastal Equities, Inc.
Lead411 offers quality contact information on a variety of companies including that of Coastal Equities, Inc.'s CEO . The company profile also contains facebook info, linkedin accounts, phone numbers, cfo contacts, and Coastal Equities, Inc. email addresses with the domain format of @coastal-one.com. Coastal Equities, Inc., is in the Investment bank/brokerage field.  If you sign up for our free trial you will see our email@coastal-one.com addresses.




Company Directory > Marvin & Palmer Associates, Inc
























Marvin & Palmer Associates INC - Wilmington, DE - Lawyer.com





















Ask A Lawyer
Tell Us Your Case Information for Fastest Lawyer Match!








                    Please include all relevant details from your case including where, when, and who it involves.                                          
                    Case details that can effectively describe the legal situation while also staying concise generally receive the best responses from lawyers.
                




Briefly Describe Your Case:









Your Contact Info:


name



Cell Phone Number



Email





Your Case Location:

zip





By submitting this lawyer request, I confirm I have read and agree to the 
                            Consent to Receive Email, Phone, Text Messages, 
                            Terms of Use, and 
                             Privacy Policy. Information provided may not be privileged or confidential.
                            
















Marvin & Palmer Associates INC at Wilmington, Delaware


Marvin & Palmer Associates INC











Marvin & Palmer Associates INC

General Practice







1201 North Market Street
19801
Wilmington
DE











Is this your firm?Upgrade to a premium listing






















                    Contact Marvin & Palmer Associates INC
















Briefly Describe Your Case:










Your Contact Info:








Your Case Location:



  FREE: Also send inquiry to other qualified local Lawyers.










                By submitting this lawyer request, I confirm I have read and agree to the 
                Consent to Receive Email, Phone, Text Messages, 
                Terms of Use, and 
                 Privacy Policy. Information provided may not be privileged or confidential.
                











Law Firms Nearby








Casarino Christman Shalk Ransom & Doss, P.A.

Criminal, Personal Injury



✓ Lawyer.com Featured
CONTACT







Wilmington, DE 19899 (New castle County)
                            










Law Office Of Brian J Chapman

Criminal, DUI-DWI, Defect and Lemon Law, Medical Malpractice, Car Accident



✓ Lawyer.com Featured
CONTACT







Wilmington, DE 19801 (New castle County)
                            










Michele D. Allen, LLC

Employment



✓ Lawyer.com Featured
CONTACT







Hockessin, DE 19707 (New castle County)
                            










Michele D. Allen, LLC

Employment



✓ Lawyer.com Featured
CONTACT







Hockessin, DE 19707 (New castle County)
                            










Knepper & Stratton

Accident & Injury, Employment



✓ Lawyer.com Featured
CONTACT







Wilmington, DE 19801











Knepper and Stratton

Accident & Injury, Employment, Criminal



✓ Lawyer.com Featured
CONTACT







Wilmington, DE 19801 (New castle County)
                            










Crabill Law, LLC

Bankruptcy & Debt



✓ Lawyer.com Featured
CONTACT







Wilmington, DE 19803 (New castle County)
                            










Kent & McBride, P.C.

Personal Injury, Car Accident, Slip & Fall Accident, Products Liability, Wrongful Death



✓ Lawyer.com Featured
CONTACT







Wilmington, DE 19801 (New castle County)
                            










MacElree Harvey, Ltd.

Business, Estate, Real Estate



✓ Lawyer.com Featured
CONTACT







Wilmington, DE 19807 (New castle County)
                            










MacElree Harvey, Ltd.

Divorce & Family Law, Divorce, Family Law, Child Custody, Prenuptial Agreements



✓ Lawyer.com Featured
CONTACT







Wilmington, DE 19807 (New castle County)
                            










Horner Law, LLC

Divorce & Family Law, Divorce, Custody & Visitation, Guardianships & Conservatorships, Litigation



✓ Lawyer.com Featured
CONTACT







Wilmington, DE 19809 (New castle County)
                            










Law Office of Christine K. Dempsey

Divorce & Family Law



✓ Lawyer.com Featured
CONTACT







Wilmington, DE 19801 (New castle County)
                            










Gregory M. McCauley, Esquire, P. C.

Income Tax, Sales & Use Tax, Payroll Taxes



✓ Lawyer.com Featured
CONTACT







Chadds Ford, PA 19317 (Delaware County)
                            










Collins and Associates

Felony, DUI-DWI, Misdemeanor, Divorce & Family Law



✓ Lawyer.com Featured
CONTACT







Wilmington, DE 19801 (New castle County)
                            










Giordano, Delcollo And Werb, P.A.

Bankruptcy, Personal Injury, Social Security -- Disability, Consumer Bankruptcy, Estate



✓ Lawyer.com Featured
CONTACT







Wilmington, DE 19808











The deBruin Firm LLC

Accident & Injury, Lawsuit & Dispute, Asbestos & Mesothelioma



✓ Lawyer.com Featured
CONTACT







Wilmington, DE 19801 (New castle County)
                            










The law office of Silverman McDonald & Friedman

Workers' Compensation



✓ Lawyer.com Featured
CONTACT







Wilmington, DE 19805 (New castle County)
                            










McCauley Law Offices, P.C.

Tax



✓ Lawyer.com Featured
CONTACT







Chadds Ford, PA 19317 (Delaware County)
                            










Schuster Law

Accident & Injury, Personal Injury, Car Accident, Medical Malpractice, Workers' Compensation



✓ Lawyer.com Featured
CONTACT







Chester, PA 19013 (Delaware County)
                            










Schuster Law

Accident & Injury, Personal Injury, Car Accident, Medical Malpractice, Workers' Compensation



✓ Lawyer.com Featured
CONTACT







Wilmington, DE 19801 (New castle County)
                            







View More Law Firms Nearby













39.747927,-75.546738













MAIN LOCATION


1201 North Market StreetSuite 2300Wilmington, DE 19801




SAMPLE LEGAL CASES



Senate Confirms Alexander Acosta as Secretary of Labor

                    On April 27, 2017, the Senate confirmed Alexander Acosta as Secretary of Labor by a vote of 60-38. Secretary Acosta was sworn into office one day later. The confirmation completed President Donald Trump's cabinet.
                




WHEN EMPLOYEES TAKE WORKPLACE COMMUNICATION OFFLINE

                    Today, many people prefer texting over many other forms of communication such as calling or emailing the recipient. This is an efficient form of communication because individuals can send a quick message about something important to them within a few seconds rather than being busy...
                




LEGAL CONSIDERATIONS OF BACKGROUND CHECKS

                    Today, many employers want to make an inquiry into an applicant’s background before offering a job with the company. Additionally, employers may want to confirm certain information such as a person’s educational credentials before making a decision to promote or transfer an employee...
                




CONFUSION WITH INDEPENDENT CONTRACTORS V. EMPLOYEES

                    Businesses may hire independent contractors and employees, and it is important that they understand the differences between these two classifications. Independent contractors do not get the same legal protections as employees do, such as being eligible for unemployment benefits...
                




WHY DOG PROFESSIONALS SHOULD OPERATE UNDER AN ENTITY TO AVOID RISK

                    Dog trainers, behavior consultants, behaviorists, sitters and other dog professionals face an enormous amount of legal risk at their business. By learning about differing types of entity formation options, these professionals can look into different ways of protecting their business...
                




AMENDMENTS TO THE TEXAS ANIMAL CRUELTY LAWS

                    Two bills pending in the Texas House and Senate aim to bolster animal welfare in our state by addressing animal cruelty crimes.
                




Florida’s PIP Law: Victims Of Motor Vehicle Accidents Must Seek Medical Treatment Within 14 Days

                    Under Florida’s personal injury protection laws, victims who are involved in motor vehicle accidents are required to seek medical treatment within 14 days in order to receive personal injury protection (PIP) benefits.
                




Aggravated Assault – Does A Reasonable Person Standard Apply For The Well-Founded Fear Element?

                    Aggravated assault is an assault with a deadly weapon without intent to kill. § 784.021(1)(a), Fla. Stat. (2014). To prove the crime of aggravated assault, the State must prove the following four elements beyond a reasonable doubt...
                




Leaving The Scene Of An Accident With Injuries In Florida

                    Imagine driving on a busy road with the sound of the outside world drowned out by the rain, windshield wipers, and the radio. When all of a sudden in the rearview mirror there are police lights...
                




Aggravated Assault – Does A Reasonable Person Standard Apply For The Well-Founded Fear Element?

                    Aggravated assault is an assault with a deadly weapon without intent to kill. § 784.021(1)(a), Fla. Stat. (2014). To prove the crime of aggravated assault, the State must prove the following four elements beyond a reasonable doubt...
                




Florida’s PIP Law: Victims Of Motor Vehicle Accidents Must Seek Medical Treatment Within 14 Days

                    Under Florida’s personal injury protection laws, victims who are involved in motor vehicle accidents are required to seek medical treatment within 14 days...
                




Survivor Benefit Plan Military Penions

                    Survivor Benefit Plan guarantees you to get your portion of the military retirement if your ex spouse dies.
                




Military Pensions

                    Military Pension Laws have changed!
                




Permanent Maintenance to Wife. Divorce Digest, Volume 6, Issue 9

                    Illinois Trial Court - Divorce Digest - Custody, Permanent Maintenance to Wife
                




USCIS Completes Data Entry of All Selected FY 2018 Cap-Subject H1B Petitions

                    On May 3, 2017, the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services (USCIS) announced that it has completed data entry of all fiscal year 2018 H1B cap-subject petitions selected in the H1B lottery. Accordingly, the USCIS will begin returning H1B cap-subject petitions that were not selected...
                




New Budget Funds Key Immigration Programs Through September 30, 2017

                    On May 5, 2017, President Donald Trump signed legislation to fund the federal government through September 30, 2017. The legislation extends key immigration programs.
                




Deliberate Fraudulent  Acts Exclusion Prevents  Coverage After Employer  Fails to Give ERISA Notice  to Employees of Plan  Conversion

                    Deliberate Fraudulent  Acts Exclusion Prevents  Coverage After Employer  Fails to Give ERISA Notice  to Employees of Plan  Conversion
                




Understanding Pennsylvania’s Protection from Abuse (PFA) Law

                    A summary on Pennsylvania's Protection from Abuse Law
                




Understanding Lebanon County’s Custody Process

                    Lebanon County's Custody Process
                




August 2017 Visa Bulletin

                    On July 11, 2017, the U.S. Department of State (DOS) released the August 2017 Visa Bulletin. The monthly Visa Bulletin contains final action dates and filing dates for the family-sponsored and employment-based immigrant visa preference categories.
                


















                                         
                                    








QuickSearch 
                                                            




near





                                                                            GO
                                                                        







Lawyer Search


Legal Protection Plan


For Lawyers



                                                    My Account



                                                    About Us










Broad Search:

Keyword:





Practice Area:


Please Select (optional)
Accident & Injury     All Accident & Injury     Animal Bite     Asbestos & Mesothelioma     Aviation Accident     Car Accident     Defamation & Slander     Malpractice     Medical Malpractice     Personal Injury     Products Liability     Property Damage     Railroad Injury     Slip & Fall Accident     Toxic Mold & Tort     Workers' Compensation     Wrongful DeathBankruptcy & Debt     All Bankruptcy & Debt     Bankruptcy     Collection     Credit & Debt     Reorganization     WorkoutBusiness     All Business     Administrative Law     Antitrust     Banking & Finance     Business Organization     Contract     Corporate     Insurance     Merger & Acquisition     SecuritiesCivil & Human Rights     All Civil & Human Rights     Civil Rights     Constitutional Law     Discrimination     Elder Law     Native PeopleConsumer Rights     All Consumer Rights     Consumer Protection     Identity TheftCriminal     All Criminal     DUI-DWI     Felony     Misdemeanor     RICO Act     Traffic     White Collar CrimeDivorce & Family Law     All Divorce & Family Law     Adoption     Child Custody     Child Support     Divorce     Family LawEmployment     All Employment     Employee Rights     Employment Contracts     Employment Discrimination     Family Medical Leave Act (FMLA)     Labor Law     Occupational Safety & Health     Pension & Benefits     Sexual Harassment     Whistleblower     Workers' Compensation     Wrongful TerminationEnvironmental Law     All Environmental Law     Natural Resources     Waste & Pollution     Environmental Law OtherEstate     All Estate     Estate Planning     Power of Attorney     Trusts     Wills & ProbateGovernment     All Government     Election & Political     Government Agencies     Government Contract     Legislative Practice     Permits     Public Interest Law     Social Security     State and Local     US Courts     WelfareHealth Care     All Health Care     Medical Products & Devices     Medicare & Medicaid     Pharmaceutical Product     Health Care OtherImmigration     All Immigration     Deportation     VisaIndustry Specialties     All Industry Specialties     Admiralty & Maritime     Advertising     Agriculture     Aviation     Communication & Media Law     Energy     Entertainment     Gaming & Alcohol     Oil & Gas     Science, Technology & Internet     Transportation & Shipping     Other IndustriesIntellectual Property     All Intellectual Property     Copyright     International Intellectual Property     Patent     TrademarkInternational     All International     Foreign Investment     International Tax     International Trade     International OtherLawsuit & Dispute     All Lawsuit & Dispute     Arbitration     Class Action     Dispute Resolution     Lawsuit     Litigation     MediationMotor Vehicle     All Motor Vehicle     Defect and Lemon Law     TrafficReal Estate     All Real Estate   Timeshare     Construction     Eminent Domain     Foreclosure     Land Use & Zoning     Landlord-Tenant     Real Estate OtherTax     All Tax     Corporate Tax     Income Tax     Sales & Use Tax     Tax LitigationOther     All Other     Education     Ethics     Juvenile Law     Military     Power of Attorney




Location:



                                                                             miles
                                                                            

Search









Advanced Search:





Lawyers
Law Firms
Practice Areas
International
Articles
Law Schools
Resources









Lawyer.com Legal Protection Plan

Prepaid legal service that can help youand your family save money withaffordable family legal insurance.
Unlimited 60-minute free consultations
Save 25% on legal fees
Up to $1 Million identity theft protectionand more!




 

See All Benefits
» Join Now







Premium Membership

For Lawyers
Benefits
Partner Discounts
Preferred Partners
Law Firms



Additional Services

LawyerLine™
LawSite Express
TopFirm Listings
AdWords Review
Jumpstart Package
SEO Review
Website Evaluation



Resources

Profile LawPoints
Sponsorships
Legal Articles
CLE Class
Seconds Count
International







My Account Details

Member Login Page
Forgot Password?
New user? Sign Up



Log in to Lawyer.com







Log in








Company Information
Lawyer.com Team
Company Culture
News & Press Releases




Contact Us
Lawyer FAQ
Testimonials




Privacy Policy
Settlement Blog
Legal Marketing Blog























Marvin & Palmer Associates, Inc.: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 26, 2017 1:28 AM ET
Capital Markets

Company Overview of Marvin & Palmer Associates, Inc.



Snapshot People




Company Overview
Marvin & Palmer Associates, Inc. is an employee owned investment manager. The firm primarily provides its services to pension and profit sharing plans. It also caters to pooled investment vehicles, high net worth individuals, investment companies, charitable organizations, corporations, endowments, and foundations. The firm manages separate client-focused equity portfolios. It also launches and manages equity mutual funds for its clients. The firm invests in the public equity markets across the globe. It primarily invests in growth stocks of large-cap companies. The firm employs a fundamental analysis with a combination of top-down and bottom-up picking approach to create its portfolios. It ...
Marvin & Palmer Associates, Inc. is an employee owned investment manager. The firm primarily provides its services to pension and profit sharing plans. It also caters to pooled investment vehicles, high net worth individuals, investment companies, charitable organizations, corporations, endowments, and foundations. The firm manages separate client-focused equity portfolios. It also launches and manages equity mutual funds for its clients. The firm invests in the public equity markets across the globe. It primarily invests in growth stocks of large-cap companies. The firm employs a fundamental analysis with a combination of top-down and bottom-up picking approach to create its portfolios. It benchmarks the performance of its equity portfolios against the MSCI World Index, Russell 1000 Growth Index, MSCI EAFE Index, and MSCI Emerging Markets Index. Marvin & Palmer Associates, Inc. was founded in 1986 and is based in Wilmington, Delaware with additional offices in Sydney, Australia and New York City.
Detailed Description


200 Bellevue ParkwaySuite 220Wilmington, DE 19809-3727United StatesFounded in 1986



Phone: 302-573-3570

Fax: 302-573-8921

www.marvinandpalmer.com







Key Executives for Marvin & Palmer Associates, Inc.




Mr. David Fred Marvin CFA


      	Chief Executive Officer, Principal, Portfolio Manager and Chairman of the Board
      








Mr. Todd David Marvin CFA


      	President, Principal, Portfolio Manager and Director
      








Mr. Stanley Palmer CFA


      	Vice Chairman Emeritus and Founder
      








Ms. Karen Twaddell Buckley


      	Chief Operating Officer and Chief Financial Officer
      








Mr. Stephen J. Gannon


      	Director of Marketing and Client Service and Principal
      





Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 



Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 @Visory LLC United States 1 Road Partners LLC United States 11T Partners, LLC United States 123Jump.com, Inc. United States 1509225 Ontario, Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Marvin & Palmer Associates, Inc., please visit www.marvinandpalmer.com.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close


















































Middleton & Co Inc MA Cuts Stake in Parker-Hannifin Corporation (PH) - Watch List News



















































Home
About
Staff
Privacy Policy
Contact
























Headlines
Business
US News
Health
World
Investing
Technology




















Parker-Hannifin Corporation - Get News & Ratings Daily

		Enter your email address below to get the latest news and analysts' ratings for Parker-Hannifin Corporation with our FREE daily email newsletter:



 






Follow Watchlist News

 











Latest News



Canaccord Genuity Lowers Chipotle Mexican Grill, Inc. (CMG) Price Target to $400.00					

Crown Castle International Corporation (NYSE:CCI) Price Target Lowered to $96.00 at Citigroup Inc.					

ThyssenKrupp AG (FRA:TKA) Given a €26.00 Price Target at Kepler Capital Markets					

Fraport AG Frankfurt Arprt Svcs Wrldwde (FRA:FRA) PT Set at €75.00 by Commerzbank Ag					

Commerzbank Ag (ETR:CBK) PT Set at €9.20 by HSBC Holdings plc					

Amadeus FiRe AG (AAD) Given a €87.00 Price Target by Warburg Research Analysts					

BB&T Corporation (BBT) Downgraded by Hilliard Lyons to “Hold”					

Bank Of New York Mellon Corporation (The) (NYSE:BK) Given a $52.00 Price Target by Bank of America Corporation Analysts					

Boeing Company (The) (BA) PT Set at $245.00 by Berenberg Bank					

Littelfuse’s (LFUS) Hold Rating Reaffirmed at Stifel Nicolaus					

Sidoti Reiterates “Buy” Rating for Sotheby’s (BID)					

National Bank Holdings Corporation (NYSE:NBHC) Given Neutral Rating at DA Davidson					

Deutsche Bank AG Raises The Blackstone Group L.P. (NYSE:BX) Price Target to $33.00					

Boeing Company (The) (NYSE:BA) Rating Increased to Buy at Zacks Investment Research					

McEwen Mining Inc. (NYSE:MUX) Lowered to “Sell” at Zacks Investment Research					

Repros Therapeutics Inc. (NASDAQ:RPRX) Downgraded by Laidlaw					

NXP Semiconductors N.V. (NASDAQ:NXPI) Rating Reiterated by BMO Capital Markets					

GlaxoSmithKline PLC (GSK) Downgraded by Zacks Investment Research					

Gilead Sciences, Inc. (GILD) Receives “Hold” Rating from BMO Capital Markets					

Huntington Bancshares’ (NASDAQ:HBAN) “Outperform” Rating Reiterated at BMO Capital Markets					



Archives

July 2017
June 2017
May 2017
April 2017
March 2017
February 2017
January 2017
December 2016
November 2016
October 2016
September 2016
August 2016
July 2016
June 2016
May 2016
March 2016
November 2015
October 2015
September 2015
August 2015
July 2015
June 2015
May 2015
April 2015
March 2015
February 2015
January 2015
December 2014
November 2014
October 2014
September 2014
August 2014
July 2014
June 2014
May 2014
April 2014
March 2014
February 2014
January 2014




 




						Middleton & Co Inc MA Cuts Stake in Parker-Hannifin Corporation (PH)					

						 July 18th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Nicole Kennedy 


							Filed Under: Investing - SEC Filing Articles 






Tweet










Middleton & Co Inc MA cut its stake in  Parker-Hannifin Corporation (NYSE:PH) by 4.6% during the second quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the SEC. The institutional investor  owned 2,055 shares of the industrial products company’s stock after selling 100 shares during the period. Middleton & Co Inc MA’s holdings in Parker-Hannifin Corporation were worth $328,000 at the end of the most recent quarter. 
A number of other hedge funds also recently made changes to their positions in PH. Harbour Capital Advisors LLC bought a new stake in  Parker-Hannifin Corporation during the first quarter valued at about $112,000.  Quadrant Capital Group LLC boosted its stake in shares of  Parker-Hannifin Corporation by 4.6% in the first quarter. Quadrant Capital Group LLC now owns 844 shares of the industrial products company’s stock valued at $131,000 after buying an additional 37 shares during the last quarter.  TrimTabs Asset Management LLC boosted its stake in shares of  Parker-Hannifin Corporation by 88.5% in the first quarter. TrimTabs Asset Management LLC now owns 852 shares of the industrial products company’s stock valued at $137,000 after buying an additional 400 shares during the last quarter.  FNY Partners Fund LP acquired a new stake in shares of  Parker-Hannifin Corporation during the first quarter valued at $160,000.  Finally, Independent Portfolio Consultants Inc. boosted its stake in shares of  Parker-Hannifin Corporation by 74.3% in the second quarter. Independent Portfolio Consultants Inc. now owns 1,124 shares of the industrial products company’s stock valued at $180,000 after buying an additional 479 shares during the last quarter. Institutional investors and hedge funds own  79.91% of the company’s stock. 
Shares of Parker-Hannifin Corporation (NYSE PH) traded down 0.50% during midday trading on Tuesday, hitting $165.14. 206,046 shares of the company’s stock were exchanged. The stock’s 50-day moving average price is $157.84 and its 200 day moving average price is $153.79. Parker-Hannifin Corporation has a one year low of $111.36 and a one year high of $166.60. The firm has a market cap of $21.99 billion, a PE ratio of 24.06 and a beta of 1.39. 




Parker-Hannifin Corporation (NYSE:PH) last posted its earnings results on Thursday, April 27th. The industrial products company reported $2.11 earnings per share (EPS) for the quarter, topping the Zacks’ consensus estimate of $1.86 by $0.25. The firm had revenue of $3.12 billion during the quarter, compared to the consensus estimate of $3.03 billion. Parker-Hannifin Corporation had a net margin of 8.11% and a return on equity of 22.14%. The company’s revenue was up 10.3% on a year-over-year basis. During the same quarter in the prior year, the company earned $1.51 EPS.  Equities research analysts forecast that  Parker-Hannifin Corporation will post $7.92 EPS for the current year. 
ILLEGAL ACTIVITY WARNING: “Middleton & Co Inc MA Cuts Stake in Parker-Hannifin Corporation (PH)” was first  posted by Watch List News and is the property of of Watch List News. If you are reading this story on another domain, it was illegally stolen and reposted in violation of United States and international copyright legislation. The correct version of this story can be accessed at https://www.watchlistnews.com/middleton-co-inc-ma-cuts-stake-in-parker-hannifin-corporation-ph/1449609.html. 
Several equities research analysts have recently weighed in on the stock. ValuEngine raised shares of Parker-Hannifin Corporation from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating in a research report on Wednesday, June 14th. Credit Suisse Group  set a $189.00 price target on shares of Parker-Hannifin Corporation and gave the stock a “buy” rating in a research report on Sunday, May 28th. Barclays PLC  set a $162.00 price target on shares of Parker-Hannifin Corporation and gave the stock a “hold” rating in a research report on Sunday, April 30th. Stifel Nicolaus  reissued a “buy” rating and set a $189.00 target price on shares of Parker-Hannifin Corporation in a research report on Friday. Finally, BMO Capital Markets  reissued a “buy” rating and set a $175.00 target price on shares of Parker-Hannifin Corporation in a research report on Thursday, April 20th. Four investment analysts have rated the stock with a hold rating and eighteen have assigned  a buy rating to the company’s stock. The company currently has a consensus rating of “Buy” and a consensus target price of $165.18.
In other Parker-Hannifin Corporation news, VP Robert W. Bond sold 12,490 shares of the stock in a transaction that occurred on Friday, April 28th. The shares were sold at an average price of $161.78, for a total value of $2,020,632.20. The sale was disclosed in a filing with the Securities & Exchange Commission, which is accessible through the SEC website. Also, VP Robert W. Malone sold 793 shares of the stock in a transaction that occurred on Wednesday, May 10th. The shares were sold at an average price of $159.36, for a total transaction of $126,372.48. Following the completion of the sale, the vice president now directly owns 11,549 shares of the company’s stock, valued at approximately $1,840,448.64. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. Insiders sold 21,563 shares of company stock valued at $3,471,380 in the last ninety days. 2.73% of the stock is owned by corporate insiders. 
Parker-Hannifin Corporation Company Profile
Parker-Hannifin Corporation is a manufacturer of motion and control technologies and systems, providing precision engineered solutions for a range of mobile, industrial and aerospace markets. The Company operates through segments: Diversified Industrial and Aerospace Systems. The Diversified Industrial Segment is an aggregation of several business units, which manufacture motion-control and fluid power system components for builders and users of various types of manufacturing, packaging, processing, transportation, agricultural, construction, and military vehicles and equipment.
Want to see what other hedge funds are holding PH? Visit HoldingsChannel.com to get the latest 13F filings and insider trades for Parker-Hannifin Corporation (NYSE:PH).



Receive News & Ratings for Parker-Hannifin Corporation Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Parker-Hannifin Corporation and related companies with Analyst Ratings Network's FREE daily email newsletter.



 










Nicole Kennedy 























 Comment on this Post

Click here to cancel reply.



Name (required)

Mail (will not be published) (required)

Website






Wordpress Hashcash needs javascript to work, but your browser has javascript disabled. Your comment will be placed in moderation!




Latest News




Sirius XM Making Big Investment In Pandora





Tax Reform Not Going Quite As Planned





Western Digital Files Lawsuit To Halt Toshiba Chip Business Sale





Sinclair Broadcast Group Announces Deal For Tribune Media





Starbucks Has A Hit With Its Unicorn Frappuccino











			© Watch List News, LLC 2008-2017. All rights reserved. 


Privacy Policy |
			About | Staff 
			| Contact 













































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft














marvin & palmer associates inc - NetFind Content Results










AOL Search
Skip over navigation


















Search the Web




























Web


Web



Content











Palmer Associates Inc. - Search for associates inc Now.



Ad
 ·
govtsearches.com/​associates inc



Find Fast Answers for Your Question With GovtSearches.com Today!




Associates Inc - LookSmart - Results for Associates Inc.



Ad
 ·
www1.looksmart.com/​Associates Inc



Results for Associates Inc. Get the look smart on Looksmart.com





Look Here



Good Results




More Info





Palmer Associates Inc - Palmer Associates Inc.



Ad
 ·
Simpli.com/​Palmer Associates Inc



Palmer Associates Inc. Visit Today & Find More Results.




Palmer Marvin Revealed - Want Info on Palmer Marvin?



Ad
 ·
Records.TruthFinder.com



Want Info on Palmer Marvin? Just Search A Name and State.





Search Records Now



Learn More



Best Background Check



Best People Search
















Marvin Traub




firm, Marvin Traub Associates. Between 1994 and 2000, Marvin Traub Associates participated in a joint venture with retail-focused investment banking firm, Financo,

more


Go to:
Encyclopedia
-
News
-
Videos
-
Reference


Source:
Wikipedia








Your search for "marvin & palmer associates inc" returned no results.









Palmer Associates Inc. - Search for associates inc Now.



Ad
 ·
govtsearches.com/​associates inc



Find Fast Answers for Your Question With GovtSearches.com Today!




Associates Inc - LookSmart - Results for Associates Inc.



Ad
 ·
www1.looksmart.com/​Associates Inc



Results for Associates Inc. Get the look smart on Looksmart.com





Look Here



Good Results




More Info





Palmer Associates Inc - Palmer Associates Inc.



Ad
 ·
Simpli.com/​Palmer Associates Inc



Palmer Associates Inc. Visit Today & Find More Results.




Palmer Marvin Revealed - Want Info on Palmer Marvin?



Ad
 ·
Records.TruthFinder.com



Want Info on Palmer Marvin? Just Search A Name and State.





Search Records Now



Learn More



Best Background Check



Best People Search




Searches related tomarvin & palmer associates inc



marvin and associates


palmer and associates llc


dr marvin palmer



fred marvin associates


g h palmer associates


palmer associates toledo





Related Searches



marvin and associates


palmer and associates llc


dr marvin palmer


fred marvin associates


g h palmer associates


palmer associates toledo




















Search the Web

















© AOL Inc. All Rights Reserved.Privacy
 | Terms of Use
 | Preferences
 | Contact Us
 | Powered by Bing™

Wow.com - Part of the AOL Search Network












Govtsearches.com












































Web Results



MSHDA - PBV Developments List - Oakland - Troy - State of Michigan

www.michigan.gov/mshda/0,4641,7-141-5555_5626-302235--,00.html
Madison Heights, MI 48071; Housing Agent: Szajna & Associates Inc. Housing ... 
Number of Units: 9 (6-2BR; 3-3BR); Development Address: 580 Palmer Dr



Palmer West Associates, Inc. t/a A&J Construction - Schools ...

www.njsda.gov/SDA-net/vendor/info?vendorCode=22291858300
Palmer West Associates, Inc. t/a A&J Construction 5026 Industrial Road 
Farmingdale NJ 07727. E-mail: allenm@ajconstruct.com. Region: Monmouth



CDC - Spirometry - Spirometry Training Program: NIOSH-Approved ...

www.cdc.gov/niosh/topics/spirometry/sponsors.html
Jun 22, 2017 ... Kendra Palmer Anderson, BA – Course Director ... http://www.palmerassociates.
com (web site) ... Occupational Health Associates, Inc. 9 Swetts ...



Graham v. Olson Wood Associates, Inc. - Connecticut Judicial Branch

jud.ct.gov/external/supapp/Cases/AROcr/CR323/323CR12.pdf
Dec 20, 2016 ... OLSON WOOD. ASSOCIATES, INC., ET AL. (SC 19626). Rogers, C. J., and 
Palmer, Zarella, Eveleigh, McDonald, Espinosa and. Robinson, Js.



U.S. Department of Labor -- Recovery Act (ARRA) Contract Awards ...

www.dol.gov/recovery/contracts.htm
Palmer. AK. 2,800.00. Chugach Government Services Inc. ARRA funding for ... 
Adams and Associates, Inc .... SOCIAL POLICY RESEARCH ASSOCIATES INC.



Prequalfied Design-Build Consultants

www.transportation.wv.gov/highways/engineering/designbuild/Pages/PrequalfiedConsultants.aspx
Michael Baker Jr., Inc. Modjeski & Masters, Inc. ms consultants, inc. Neff, Longest 
& Beam and Associates, LLC. Niles and Associates. Palmer Engineering.



Complaint: SEC v. Stand-By Systems, Inc. and Kenneth J. Palmer

www.sec.gov/litigation/complaints/complr17463.htm
Apr 8, 2002 ... Stand-By Oxygen Systems, Inc. ("Stand-By Oxygen"), located in Dallas, ... Palmer 
made most of the securities sales to business associates and ...



CDC - Spirometry - Spirometry Training Program: Course Audit and ...

www.cdc.gov/niosh/topics/spirometry/sponsor-renewal-dates.html
#051, Palmer Associates, 6/30/2018, 6/30/2018, 8/31/2019 ... #093, Occupational 
Health Associates, Inc. 3/28/2018, 3/28/2018, 1/31/2019. #100, The Phoenix ...



Consumer Alerts 2015 - California Department of Business Oversight

www.dbo.ca.gov/Consumers/alerts/2015.asp
The callers claim a Los Angeles, CA law firm called Palmer & Associates has ... 
that an entity called “Lending America, Inc.” is falsely claiming to be licensed by ...



Consultant Selection Report - Kentucky Transportation Cabinet

transportation.ky.gov/Professional-Services/Documents/Consultant%20Selection%20Report.pdf
Jun 1, 2017 ... Strand Associates, Inc. c/o PEH. 2nd Place Firm. Crawford J. M. and Associates, 
Inc. 3rd Place Firm. Palmer Engineering. Selection Committee.











Related Search



                                Emerson Lake Palmer Greatest Hits




                                Keke Palmer Age




                                Keke Palmer Music Video




                                Keke Palmer




                                Emerson Lake and Palmer




                                Keke Palmer Lyrics




                                Keke Palmer Biography











Privacy


Terms


© 2017 IAC Publishing, LLC























palmer & associates inc - WOW.com - Web Results










AOL Search
Skip over navigation

















Search the Web



























Web





Images


Images




Reference


Reference










Palmer Associates Inc - Palmer Associates Inc.



Ad
 ·
Simpli.com/​Palmer Associates Inc



Palmer Associates Inc. Visit Today & Find More Results.




Palmer Associates Inc. - Search for associates inc Now.



Ad
 ·
govtsearches.com/​associates inc



Find Fast Answers for Your Question With GovtSearches.com Today!




Palmer Associates Inc - Palmer Associates Inc. | ask.com



Ad
 ·
www.ask.com/​Palmer Associates Inc



Search Palmer Associates Inc.





Ask a Question



Questions and Answers



Explore Q&A



Ask.com – What’s your Question?





Buy Palmer - Buy Palmer at Zoro.com.



Ad
 ·
www.zoro.com



Buy Palmer at Zoro.com. Everything To Clean, Build & Fix!





Zmail Sign Up



Contact  Us



FAQ's



Browse All Products





Searches related topalmer & associates inc



palmer and associates llc


palmer associates toledo


g h palmer associates



law offices of palmer reifler and ass...


palmer & associates orlando fl




Web Results

Palmer Associates Inc.

www.palmerassoc.com


“Ti Marine Contracting and Palmer Associates have been working together since 1980 to design and build production systems for the cryogenic insulation industry in ...



Contact



Company History



Custom Machine Design



New Product/Project



Contact | Palmer Associates Inc.

www.palmerassoc.com/contact


Consider Palmer Associates for your next project. Our staff of design and process engineers is ready to assist you in consultation and design project management ...


Palmer Associates :: Spirometry & Respiratory Training ...

palmerassociates.com


Palmer Associates Spirometry Training, Respiratory Protecction & Fit Test Training, Industrial Medical Surveillance & Quality Control Systems


Palmer Associates, Inc | Indianapolis Awards and Recognition

www.pai-recognition.com


Palmer Associate is a full service awards and recognition program provider located in Indianapolis, Indiana.


Palmer Associates Inc.

devel.palmerassoc.com


Palmer Associates Inc. Innovation solutions to present day industrial automation problems require imagination, skill, and experience. Let us engineer a solution for you.


Welcome to Byrd Palmer & Associates | Myrtle Beach ...

byrdpalmer.com


Myrtle Beach & Conway South Carolina Property Management & Leasing Company. Byrd Palmer & Associates, Inc. is the Grand Strand's premier property management company.


Palmer & Associates Inc - Bear , DE - Company Information

https://www.dandb.com/businessdirectory/palmerassociatesinc-bear...


Find the Palmer & Associates Inc business profile in Bear ...


Palmer & Associates, Inc. - AR, CA, DC, FL, GA, IA, IL, IN ...

https://www.bizapedia.com/us/palmer-associates-inc.html


There are 22 companies that go by the name of Palmer & Associates, Inc. in Atlanta GA, Burlington VT, Burlington, VT, Capitola CA, Chicago IL, Duluth GA, Eas...


Kirk Palmer Associates - Retail Executive Search and ...

kirkpalmer.com


Founded in 1987, Kirk Palmer Associates today is one of the largest industry-specific executive search firms in the world.


Palmer & Associates | Insurance for Cars, Homes ...

www.palmerinsurance.com


Features information about home, auto, flood and business policies. Includes links of local interest and a private area for their clients.










Palmer Associates Inc - Palmer Associates Inc.



Ad
 ·
Simpli.com/​Palmer Associates Inc



Palmer Associates Inc. Visit Today & Find More Results.




Palmer Associates Inc. - Search for associates inc Now.



Ad
 ·
govtsearches.com/​associates inc



Find Fast Answers for Your Question With GovtSearches.com Today!




Palmer Associates Inc - Palmer Associates Inc. | ask.com



Ad
 ·
www.ask.com/​Palmer Associates Inc



Search Palmer Associates Inc.





Ask a Question



Questions and Answers



Explore Q&A



Ask.com – What’s your Question?





Buy Palmer - Buy Palmer at Zoro.com.



Ad
 ·
www.zoro.com



Buy Palmer at Zoro.com. Everything To Clean, Build & Fix!





Zmail Sign Up



Contact  Us



FAQ's



Browse All Products




Searches related topalmer & associates inc



palmer and associates llc


palmer associates toledo


g h palmer associates



law offices of palmer reifler and ass...


palmer & associates orlando fl




12345Next






Answers







Commonwealth Associates, Inc.



Commonwealth Associates, Inc. is a U.S. engineering design firm headquartered in Jackson, Michigan. The firm provides engineering and consulting...

more






Finegold Alexander + Associates Inc



Finegold Alexander + Associates Inc is an architecture firm based in Boston, Massachusetts, United States. It was established in 1962. Previous firm...

more






Associated Apparel Industries, Inc.



Associated Apparel Industries, Inc. was a Chicago, Illinois women's undergarment business which flourished in the late 1920s prior to going bankrupt in...

more



















Search the Web

















© AOL Inc. All Rights Reserved.Privacy
 | Terms of Use
 | About our Ads
 | Preferences
 | Contact Us
 | Powered by Bing™

Part of the AOL Search Network.








